Utah statutes.
54-17-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Affected electrical utility" means an electrical corporation with at
least 200,000 retail customers in the state.
(2)  "Benchmark option" means an energy resource against which bids in an open
bid process may be evaluated that:
(a)  could be constructed or owned by:
(i)  an affected electrical utility; or
(ii)  an affiliate of an affected electrical utility; or
(b)  may be a purchase of:
(i)  electricity;
(ii)  electric generating capacity; or
(iii)  electricity and electric generating capacity.
(3)  "Integrated resource plan" means a plan that contains:
(a)  the demand and energy forecast by the affected electrical utility for at
least a ten-year period;
(b)  the affected electrical utility's options for meeting the requirements
shown in its load and resource forecast in an economic and reliable manner,
including:
(i)  demand-side and supply-side options; and
(ii)  a brief description and summary cost-benefit analysis, if available, of
each option that was considered;
(c)  the affected electrical utility's assumptions and conclusions with
respect to the effect of the plan on the cost and reliability of energy
service;
(d)  a description of the external environmental and economic consequences of
the plan to the extent practicable; and
(e)  any other data and analyses as the commission may require.
(4)  "Significant energy resource" for an affected electrical utility means a
resource that consists of:
(a)  a total of 100 megawatts or more of new generating capacity that has a
dependable life of 10 or more years;
(b)  a purchase of the following if the contract is for a term of 10 or more
years and not less than 100 megawatts:
(i)  electricity;
(ii)  electric generating capacity; or
(iii)  electricity and electrical generating capacity;
(c)  the purchase or lease by an affected electrical utility from an
affiliated company of:
(i)  a generating facility;
(ii)  electricity;
(iii)  electrical generating capacity; or
(iv)  electricity and electrical generating capacity;
(d)  a contract with an option for the affected electrical utility or an
affiliate to purchase a resource that consists of not less than 100 megawatts
or more of new generating capacity that has a remaining dependable life of 10
or more years; or
(e)  a type of resource designated by the commission as a significant energy
resource in rules made by the commission in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, after considering the affected
electrical utility's integrated resource plan and action plan.
(5)  "Solicitation" means a request for proposals or other invitation for
persons to submit a bid or proposal through an open bid process for
construction or acquisition of a significant energy resource.
